Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.451

Fee assessed. (Expires September 30, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1552.SL) ***

(1) A fee of ten dollars is created and shall be assessed on each real estate broker and managing broker's original license and upon each renewal of a license with an expiration date after October 1, 1999, including renewals of inactive licenses.

(2) This section expires September 30, 2025.

[ 2015 c 175 s 1; 2010 c 156 s 1; 2008 c 23 s 45; 2005 c 185 s 1; 1999 c 192 s 1. Formerly RCW 18.85.520.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 156: "This act takes effect July 1, 2010." [ 2010 c 156 s 4.]